Maryland, session 2026, HB1447.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
17–112.
(A) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL ESTABLISH AND IMPLEMENT A SYSTEM
TO COLLECT INFORMATION TO DETERMINE THE ADDRESS TO WHICH A CONTRACT
FOR THE REQUIRED SECURITY UNDER THIS SUBTITLE IS CONNECTED.
(B) (1) IF THE INFORMATION COLLECTED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF
THIS SECTION INDICATES THAT THE OWNER OF A VEHICLE IS RESIDENT OF THE
STATE AND THE VEHICLE IS REGISTERED IN ANOTHER STATE, THE
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1447*

HOUSE BILL 1447
ADMINISTRATION MAY CONDUCT AN INVESTIGATION TO ENSURE COMPLIANCE WITH
THE REGISTRATION REQUIREMENTS UNDER TITLE 13 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(2) IF THE ADMINISTRATION DETERMINES, AFTER CONDUCTING AN
INVESTIGATION UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THAT THE OWNER OF
THE VEHICLE IS A RESIDENT OF THE STATE AND HAS FAILED TO PROPERLY
REGISTER THE VEHICLE WITH THE ADMINISTRATION, THE ADMINISTRATION:
(I) SHALL PROVIDE NOTICE OF NONCOMPLIANCE TO THE
OWNER OF THE VEHICLE; AND
(II) MAY ASSESS THE OWNER OF THE VEHICLE WITH A PENALTY
OF $150.
(C) IF, WITHIN 60 DAYS AFTER RECEIPT OF NOTICE UNDER SUBSECTION (B)
OF THIS SECTION, THE OWNER OF THE VEHICLE HAS FAILED TO PROPERLY
REGISTER THE VEHICLE WITH THE ADMINISTRATION, THE ADMINISTRATION MAY,
IN ADDITION TO ANY OTHER PENALTY PROVIDED IN THIS ARTICLE, ASSESS THE
OWNER OF THE VEHICLE WITH A PENALTY OF $500.
(D) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL DEPOSIT PENALTIES COLLECTED UNDER
THIS SECTION IN THE TRANSPORTATION TRUST FUND.
(E) THE ADMINISTRATION MAY ENTER INTO CONTRACTS WITH PRIVATE
PARTIES TO PROCURE THE SERVICES OF INDEPENDENT AGENTS TO ASSIST IN
CARRYING OUT THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.